Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 2

Administration, Enforcement, Prohibited Acts

57-4-201. Alcoholic beverage commission to administer law — Permits — Procedure — Rules and regulations.

The commission created pursuant to chapter 1 of this title, has the authority to administer parts 1-3 of this chapter.

The commission shall make regulations, not inconsistent with this chapter, for clarifying, interpreting, carrying out and enforcing the terms of this chapter, for ensuring the proper and orderly conduct of business by licensees, and for regulating all advertising of alcoholic beverages by licensees.

Expiration of the licenses granted pursuant to this chapter shall be as provided by § 57-3-213(a), (b) and (c).

Further, all the provisions of §§ 57-3-214 and 57-3-404(a) and (b), shall apply to licensees under this chapter.

Any person, firm or corporation owning any hotel, convention center, premier type tourist resort, restaurant, club, historic performing arts center, community theater, theater, historic interpretive center, urban park center, zoological institution, public aquarium, museum, historic mansion house site or commercial passenger boat company as defined in § 57-4-102, desiring to sell wine or other alcoholic beverages for consumption on its premises where food may be served, shall make application to the commission in duplicate on forms furnished by the commission for a permit so to do. The commission is authorized to issue a limited permit to a restaurant making application under § 57-4-101(c)(1), authorizing such restaurant to serve wine but not any other alcoholic beverages. Notwithstanding § 57-3-803, the commission is authorized to issue a limited license to a retail food store authorizing a restaurant within a retail food store to serve wine but no other alcoholic beverages within a designated area within the retail food store. A retail food store may receive a restaurant license under this section without complying with seating requirements or requirements regarding minimum food sales for a wine only licensee as long as the retail food store provides prepared food for sale to customers and pays a license fee equal to the license fee in § 57-4-301(b)(1)(R)(vii). Any person, firm or corporation desiring to sell wine or other alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises of any terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport as defined in § 57-4-102, or of a commercial airline travel club as defined in § 57-4-102, or of a sports authority facility as defined in § 57-4-102, shall make application to the commission in duplicate on forms furnished by the commission for a permit to do so. No person, firm or corporation shall be authorized to engage in making such sales until the permit therefor is approved and issued by the commission.

No license may be granted hereunder to any establishment when any person, firm or corporation having at least a five percent (5%) ownership interest in the establishment has been convicted within ten (10) years prior to the application for a license hereunder of a violation of the laws governing the sale or manufacture of alcoholic beverages or of any felony.

If a license has been issued to an establishment as a restaurant pursuant to § 57-4-102 and such licensee desires to exchange its license as a restaurant for a license as a limited service restaurant, the commission may issue the establishment a license as a limited service restaurant in accordance with Chapter 1133 of the Public Acts of 2010, upon the filing of an application by the licensee for the issuance of a license as a limited service restaurant, together with the payment of the application fee required pursuant to § 57-4-301(b)(1) and a sworn statement indicating the gross revenue from the previous year derived from food sales and the gross revenue derived from liquor sales, and, if approved, paying the license fee, or the prorated difference between its restaurant license fee and the license fee, if applicable, required pursuant to § 57-4-301(b)(1)(W). Such statement shall determine the appropriate license fee to be paid. It is the intent that on-premises licenses permitting the sale of alcoholic beverages at restaurants shall not be required to fulfill any other requirements in order to be issued a license to serve alcoholic beverages as a limited service restaurant.

Should the commission find that any restaurant fails to satisfy the requirements of § 57-4-102(30)(A) but would otherwise qualify as a limited service restaurant, such establishment shall be permitted thirty (30) days following such finding to elect to exchange its license for a limited service restaurant license upon paying to the commission a new application fee and the prorated difference between its restaurant license fee and the license fee required pursuant to § 57-4-301(b)(1)(X).

For purposes of exchanging a restaurant license as a limited service restaurant license, if the licensee had been issued a license by the alcoholic beverage commission as a restaurant, the initial license fee shall be based on the percentage of gross sales the establishment generated from the service of meals during the year previous to the year the license as a limited service restaurant is requested.

Any establishment applying for a renewal of its license shall submit a sworn statement indicating the gross revenue from the previous year derived from food sales and the gross revenue derived from liquor sales. Such statement shall determine the license fee to be paid pursuant to § 57-4-301(b)(1)(X).

If a license is requested by an applicant who does not hold an existing license as a restaurant, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the amount of gross sales from prepared food will be between zero percent (0%) but not more than fifteen percent (15%). An applicant may rebut the presumption by including with the application a business plan which indicates the gross sales from prepared food will be higher than fifteen percent (15%). The commission shall advise each applicant of the applicant's right to include with the application a business plan which includes a projection of the amount of gross sales of prepared food and in such case, the commission shall assess the appropriate license fee based on such projection.

Any establishment applying for a renewal of its license as a limited service restaurant shall submit a sworn statement indicating the percentage of gross revenue for the previous year derived from food sales and the gross revenue derived from sales of alcoholic beverages. If the statement indicates the gross sales from prepared food was higher than the initial projection or higher than the amount actually sold in the previous year, requiring the payment of a lower licensure fee, the commission shall refund the difference to the licensee within thirty (30) days of the date the statement is filed with the commission. If the statement indicates the gross sales from prepared food was less than the projection or than the amount actually sold in the previous year, requiring the payment of a higher licensure fee, the commission shall require the licensee to pay to the commission the difference between the licensure fee actually paid at the time the renewal fee is paid.

Any club seeking to obtain a license under this chapter shall, as a condition precedent to its obtaining such license, cause to be printed in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality where such club is located a public notice that the club is seeking a license from the commission to sell liquor by the drink. The notice shall include the name and address of each officer of such club, the address of the location of the club, an indication of the number of regular dues paying members, and the name and address of the individual to be in actual charge of the sale of alcoholic beverages. The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations further establishing the content and format of such notice.

Any club seeking to obtain a license under this chapter shall submit with its application a certificate signed by the county mayor or chair of the county commission in which the club is located if outside the corporate limits of a municipality or, if within a municipality, from the mayor or a majority of the commission, city council or legislative body of the municipality by whatsoever name designated, or if the municipality has no mayor, from the highest executive of the municipality. The certificate must state that the persons to be in actual charge of the sale of alcoholic beverages are of good moral character and are personally known to the official or officials signing the certificate, or that such official or officials have made careful investigation of the person's or persons' general character, and from such investigation it is found to be good. In the event the club is unable to obtain such certificate from the proper certifying official, the applicant shall file with the commission with the applicant's application a petition in duplicate stating that the applicant has made application to the certifying official for the certificate and same has been wrongfully, illegally or arbitrarily refused, and otherwise setting forth reasons why the applicant is entitled to such license, notwithstanding the refusal aforementioned, and the manner in which the refusal is wrongful, illegal or arbitrary. The commission shall hold a hearing to determine whether the license shall be issued. The hearing shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5. The commission shall make such order granting or refusing the license as, in its discretion, the entire record at such hearing shall justify, and such order shall be effective from its date.

This subsection (c) shall not be applicable to any club having a license on May 1, 1980, or to the renewal of a license for such club.

The commission shall have authority to require an applicant, under oath, to disclose the following information:

The name of the applicant;

Location of the hotel, convention center, premier type tourist resort, restaurant, club, historic performing arts center, community theater, theater, historic interpretive center, urban park center, zoological institution, public aquarium, museum, historic mansion house site, terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport, commercial airline travel club, commercial passenger boat company, or sports authority facility;

Sufficient data to establish that applicant meets the requirements of §§ 57-3-110, 57-4-101, 57-4-102;

The true owner thereof;

That neither the applicant nor any person to be employed in the serving of beverages authorized herein shall be a person who has been convicted of any violation of the laws against possession, sale, manufacture or transportation of intoxicating liquor or of any felony within eight (8) years prior to the application for a license hereunder;

That the manager and/or operator of the hotel, convention center, premier type tourist resort, restaurant, club, zoological institution, public aquarium, museum, community theater, theater, historic interpretive center, historic performing arts center, establishment in a terminal building of a commercial air carrier airport, commercial airline travel club, commercial passenger boat company, or sports authority facility seeking such permit is of good moral character; and

Such other relevant information as may be required by the commission.

The commission is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations governing its procedure but it shall consider all applications promptly.

Notwithstanding any provision of this title to the contrary, an entity that holds a license to manufacture high alcohol content beer issued by the commission shall be authorized to sell on its premises beer or high alcohol content beer which has been brewed on such premises, for consumption on its premises without the requirement of an additional license under this part. Any sale of high alcohol content beer by such manufacturer or brewery shall be subject to the tax imposed by § 57-4-301(c).

Any manufacturer or brewery electing to effect sales of beer or high alcohol content beer for consumption on its premises must advise the commission as to the designated area where such sales will occur and shall be subject to the conditions of § 57-4-203 for such sales, except such manufacturer or brewery may effect sales for off-premises consumption pursuant to § 57-3-202(h).

Notwithstanding any law or rule to the contrary, upon collection of a fifty-dollar licensing fee, the commission may issue temporary licenses not to exceed thirty (30) days to any new applicant for a license issued pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1970, ch. 451, § 1; 1972, ch. 682, § 3; 1972, ch. 756, § 4; 1979, ch. 401, § 3; T.C.A., § 57-154; Acts 1980, ch. 895, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1980, ch. 898, § 1; Acts 1981, ch. 232, § 1; 1981, ch. 447, § 1; 1981, ch. 475, §§ 3, 4; 1983, ch. 52, §§ 3-5; 1983, ch. 300, § 4; 1983, ch. 469, §§ 3-5; 1984, ch. 975, §§ 3-5; 1986, ch. 643, § 1; 1986, ch. 899, §§ 4-6; 1987, ch. 444, §§ 5-7; 1991, ch. 219, § 3; 1992, ch. 674, §§ 3-5; 1998, ch. 939, §§ 4, 5; 2001, ch. 74, § 3; 2003, ch. 90, § 2; 2010, ch. 1133, § 5; 2011, ch. 448, § 14; 2012, ch. 947, § 1; 2014, ch. 861, § 24; 2014, ch. 915, § 2; 2015, ch. 391, § 1; 2016, ch. 830, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1983, ch. 300, § 6 provided that the amendment by that act inserting “historic mansion house site” shall apply only to counties having a population of 450,000 or greater according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent census.

Acts 2003, ch. 90, § 2 directed the code commission to change all references from “county executive” to “county mayor” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Certain 1987 amendments to section inapplicable to certain counties, §57-4-104.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1986, 54 Tenn. L. Rev. 457 (1987).

Attorney General Opinions. As a municipal corporation the city of Clarksville cannot obtain a license to sell liquor by the drink at any location or sell alcoholic beverages or beer to either private party lessees and guests or to the general public; no city employee or nonprofit corporation created or controlled by the city may obtain a permit to sell liquor by the drink or obtain a beer permit on behalf of the city. OAG 14-03, 2014 Tenn. AG LEXIS 5 (1/9/14)

Licensing and taxation of hotels selling alcohol for consumption on the premises. OAG 16-05, 2016 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (2/9/2016).

57-4-202. Revocation or suspension of permits — Pilot project concerning local and municipal beer boards.

The commission shall have authority to revoke or suspend any permit granted herein for the violations of any applicable provision of this chapter, and any person aggrieved by the action of this commission in revoking or suspending a permit, or in refusing to grant a permit, may have such action reviewed as provided by the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

As a pilot project to terminate July 1, 2014, unless extended by the general assembly, if, pursuant to § 57-5-108(n), a local or municipal beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages within any county included within subsection (d), sends a certified letter, return receipt requested to the executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission providing notice that the beer board has suspended or revoked the permit of an establishment for a violation of chapter 5 of this title, upon receipt of the certified letter, the executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission shall:

Schedule a show-cause hearing for the next regularly scheduled meeting of the commission to be held at least fourteen (14) days following the date the executive director receives the certified letter to provide an opportunity for the licensee to appear and show cause why the license to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises should not be suspended or revoked for violations of this chapter based on actions taken by the beer board pursuant to § 57-5-108(n); and

Notify the individual or business entity, which is listed as the licensee at the same location where the beer permit had been suspended or revoked, of the date and time of the show-cause hearing.

If the alcoholic beverage commission finds that a sufficient violation or violations of this chapter have occurred at such location, then the commission shall suspend or revoke the license of the establishment to the same extent and at least for the same period of time as the beer board has suspended or revoked the permit of the establishment pursuant to § 57-5-108(n).

If the licensee fails to appear or decides to surrender the license to the alcoholic beverage commission in lieu of appearing at the show-cause hearing, the license shall be suspended or revoked by the commission, and no license to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises shall be issued by the commission to any person for the location where the beer board suspended or revoked the license or permit pursuant to § 57-5-108(n) for the period of time included in the decision of the beer board.

Notwithstanding § 57-1-201(b)(1), the alcoholic beverage commission shall not have the authority to and shall not issue a fine in lieu of suspending or revoking the license of an establishment whose license had been suspended or revoked by the beer board pursuant to § 57-5-108(n).

The decision of the alcoholic beverage commission is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the commission in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

As a pilot project to terminate July 1, 2014, unless extended by the general assembly, when the alcoholic beverage commission suspends the license to sell alcoholic beverages on the premises at any establishment within any county included within subsection (d), for any violation or violations, as defined in this chapter, the commission is authorized to notify the local or municipal beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer or malt beverages within such county by certified mail, return receipt requested, of the action taken by the commission. Such notice shall include the record of evidence and the determination made by the alcohol beverage commission in suspending or revoking the license.

Upon receipt of such notice, the local or municipal beer board shall take the actions required pursuant to § 57-5-108(o) with respect to violations as defined in chapter 5 of this title related to the permit for the sale of beer or malt beverages for consumption on the premises at the location where the violation of this chapter occurred.

The suspension or revocation decision of the commission made pursuant to subdivision (c)(1)(A) is final, and any party aggrieved thereby may appeal the decision of the commission in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act.

The pilot project established by subsections (b) and (c) shall only apply in counties having a population, according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:

not less than nor more than

6,800 6,900

19,100 19,150

22,600 22,675

32,200 32,300

35,600 35,700

51,400 51,500

56,800 56,900

336,400 336,500

432,200 432,300

[Deleted by 2020 amendment.]

Acts 1967, ch. 211, § 1; 1979, ch. 374, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., §§ 57-152, 57-155; Acts 2012, ch. 881, § 2; 2013, ch. 236, § 68; 2020, ch. 711, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. For tables of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment deleted former (e) which read: “(e) The executive director of the alcoholic beverage commission shall file a report with the state and local government committee of the senate and the state government committee of the house of representatives no later than March 15, 2014, on the success or failure of the pilot project created pursuant to subsections (b) and (c) and §57-5-108(n) and (o), together with the executive director’s recommendations as to whether the pilot project should be extended, continued or terminated and recommendations for legislative action, if any are required, based on the executive director’s findings. The report, at a minimum, shall contain:“(1) The number of permits or licenses suspended or revoked; “(2) Whether such suspensions or revocations were appealed; “(3) The extent to which a court upheld or overturned such suspensions or revocations; “(4) Whether licensees or permittees surrendered their license or permit in lieu of having a license suspended or revoked;“(5) Whether a new license or permit was issued to the same person or business entity for a new or the same location, if such person or business entity had previously surrendered a license or permit in accordance with subdivision (e)(4); and“(6) The effect the implementation of the pilot project had on the activities of the establishments holding licenses and permits issued by the alcoholic beverage commission or the local or municipal beer board responsible for controlling the sale of beer within the locality impacted by the pilot project.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 711, § 11, June 15, 2020.